Florida, session 2026, SB1008.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âPresent subsection (29) of section 1001.42, 22 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (30), and a new 23 subsection (29) is added to that section, to read: 24 1001.42âPowers and duties of district school board.âThe 25 district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all 26 powers and perform all duties listed below: 27 (29)âNONDISCRIMINATORY AND SAFE STUDENT PROGRAMS AND 28 SERVICES.â 29 (a)âA district school board may refer students to 30 organizations that provide student support services, including 31 student support programs that incorporate mentoring, counseling, 32 tutoring, and extracurricular programs. 33 (b)âTo be eligible to be recommended, endorsed, referred, 34 or otherwise promoted by a school district: 35 1.âAn organization may not restrict participation on the 36 basis of race, color, or ethnicity. 37 2.âA mentoring organization that represents through its 38 website, publications, or promotional materials that it serves 39 students of a single race or ethnic group must provide written 40 verification to the district school board demonstrating that the 41 organization employs or engages mentors, staff, or volunteers 42 from diverse racial and ethnic backgrounds sufficient to serve 43 the districtâs student population before the district may 44 recommend or refer students to the organization. 45 3.a.âAn organization must ensure that each person who comes 46 into contact with students, or is present in the same building 47 while services are being provided to students, has successfully 48 completed a level 2 background screening pursuant to s. 435.04. 49 Each organization is responsible for initiating and maintaining 50 its own level 2 background screenings and providing such 51 documentation to the district school board. The district school 52 board may impose a fee to review the documentation and comply 53 with the requirements of this subsection. A person may not 54 provide or assist in providing student support services on 55 behalf of such organization without the level 2 background 56 screening. 57 b.âThis subparagraph applies to services provided on campus 58 or off campus. 59 c.âThis subparagraph does not apply to off-campus, school 60 sponsored activities where students are under the direct 61 supervision of school personnel, school volunteers, or athletic 62 coaches employed or contracted by the school district if such 63 personnel, volunteers, or coaches remain present for the 64 duration of the activity and maintain responsibility for student 65 safety and supervision. 66 (c)âEach public school that provides or hosts mentoring or 67 student support services shall post and maintain information 68 regarding the available programs on the school website. The 69 information must include all of the following: 70 1.âThe name and description of each program available to 71 students. 72 2.âThe eligibility requirements for participation in each 73 program. 74 3.âThe contact information for the program coordinator or 75 designated school personnel for the program. 76 4.âThe application process or participation requirements 77 for each program. 78 (d)âThe district school board shall ensure compliance with 79 this subsection and maintain documentation demonstrating that an 80 organization meets the requirements of paragraph (b). 81 (e)âEach district school superintendent shall, upon the 82 request of the Department of Education, submit a report 83 demonstrating compliance with this subsection within 30 days 84 after such request. The report must include all of the following 85 information: 86 1.âThe total number of public schools within the district 87 that participated in mentoring or student support programs 88 during the previous school year, including the names and 89 addresses of the schools. 90 2.âThe name of each organization providing such mentoring 91 or student support programs within the district and the type of 92 services the organization provided. 93 3.âEvidence that each participating organization meets the 94 requirements of paragraph (b). 95 4.âThe percentage of schools served by mentoring or 96 student-support programs. 97 5.âThe total number of students served by mentoring or 98 student support programs during the previous school year. 99 6.âDisaggregated demographic information of the students 100 served by each mentoring or student-support program, including 101 race, ethnicity, and grade level. 102 7.âAny additional information requested by the department. 103 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.